Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 7

Arkansas Crime Commission

12-7-101 — 12-7-106. [Repealed.]

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-8-101. Division of Arkansas State Police created.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-401; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5757.

12-8-102. Commission created — Members — Meetings — Elective office.

(A)Four (4) members shall be appointed from each of the four (4) congressional districts and three (3) shall be appointed from the state at large.

All appointments made at any time other than on the day following the expiration of a term shall be for the unexpired portion of the term.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, §§ 2, 3; 1949, No. 157, § 1; 1953, No. 74, § 1; 1969, No. 394, § 1; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1035, § 1; 1981, No. 540, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 6-616, 42-402, 42-403, 42-403.1; reen. Acts 1987, No. 862, § 1; 1991, No. 1099, § 12; 1991, No. 1223, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 64; 1999, No. 149, § 1; 2017, No. 250, § 1.

12-8-103. Commission's powers and duties — Restrictions.

The Arkansas State Police Commission shall:

Approve or disapprove each promotion;

Approve or disapprove each demotion for nondisciplinary reasons; and

(1)The commission shall hear appeals of any disciplinary action taken against a commissioned officer by the director that results in removal, suspension, discharge, demotion, or disciplinary transfer.

The appeal shall be heard under §12-8-204(c).

The members of the commission are granted disciplinary authority equal to that of supervisory and administrative personnel of the Division of Arkansas State Police with respect to violations of rules committed by a division employee in the presence of a commissioner.

(1)In addition to its existing powers and duties, the commission may administer oaths and subpoena witnesses, books, records, and other documents deemed necessary for the proper investigation and performance of any powers, functions, or duties of the commission.

All such subpoenas shall be issued by the chair of the commission or such other members of the commission as authorized by a majority vote of the membership of the commission.

(A)Any person failing to appear or to produce the books, records, or documents subpoenaed by the commission shall be guilty of contempt.

For such purposes, the commission may promulgate and enforce reasonable and necessary rules.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 2; 1949, No. 157, § 1; 1953, No. 74, § 1; 1981, No. 45, § 2; 1981, No. 540, §§ 10, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-401.1, 42-402, 42-403.2, 42-403.3; Acts 2001, No. 1697, § 1; 2005, No. 666, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 844, 845; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5758, 5759.

12-8-104. Director.

(A)The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may designate that some or all employees of the Division of Arkansas State Police be trained pursuant to a memorandum of understanding between the State of Arkansas and the United States Department of Justice or the United States Department of Homeland Security concerning the enforcement of federal immigration laws on federal and interstate highways in the State of Arkansas.

Transfer, assign, and reassign from one division to another division any member of the Division of Arkansas State Police or other employee of the Division of Arkansas State Police; or

(A)Subject to the approval of the commission, promote or demote in rank any member of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

(A)The memorandum of understanding described in subdivision (j)(1) of this section must be signed on behalf of the State of Arkansas by the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Governor, and the Director of the Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, §§ 4, 14, 21; 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 65, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-404, 42-414, 42-421; Acts 1987, No. 1037, § 13; 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 285, § 11; 2001, No. 750, § 1; 2001, No. 1697, § 2; 2005, No. 665, § 1; 2005, No. 907, § 1; 2005, No. 2136, § 2; 2007, No. 1048, § 1; 2011, No. 779, § 1; 2017, No. 707, § 15; 2019, No. 910, § 5760.

12-8-105. Officers and members — Oath.

Before entering upon their duties, all members and officers of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall take the oath as now provided by law for public officials.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall take the additional oath that he or she will not be either directly or indirectly interested in any purchase made by or for the division.

Any violation of oath shall constitute perjury and upon conviction shall be punished accordingly.

The oath provided for in this section shall be filed in duplicate, the original filed with the division and a copy with the Secretary of the Arkansas State Police Commission.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-414; Acts 2001, No. 1697, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 5761.

12-8-106. Division of Arkansas State Police — Duties and powers — Restrictions — Municipal police barred from patrolling certain highways.

(1)It shall be the duty of the Division of Arkansas State Police to:

Patrol the public highways, make arrests, and enforce the laws of this state relating to motor vehicles and the use of the state highways;

Establish, maintain, and enforce a towing rotation list to assist in clearing highways of motor vehicles which have been involved in accidents or abandoned;

Assist in the collection of delinquent motor vehicle license taxes and the collection of gasoline and other taxes that are required by law; and

Determine when, if possible, a person or persons are the cause of injury to any state highway or other state property and arrest all persons criminally responsible for injury to any state highway or other state property and bring them before the proper officer for trial.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may promulgate necessary rules to carry out the purpose and intent of subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section.

The Division of Arkansas State Police shall be conservators of the peace and as such shall have the powers possessed by police officers in cities and county sheriffs in counties, except that the Division of Arkansas State Police may exercise such powers anywhere in this state.

The Division of Arkansas State Police shall have the authority to establish a Crimes Against Children Division, either through transfer or by contract, to conduct child abuse investigations, to administer the Child Abuse Hotline, and, when consistent with rules promulgated by the Division of Arkansas State Police, to provide training and technical assistance to local law enforcement in conducting child abuse investigations.

The police officers shall have all the power and authority of the State Fire Marshal and shall assist in making investigations of arson, §5-38-301, and such other offenses as the director may direct and shall be subject to the call of the circuit courts of the state and the Governor.

However, this chapter shall not be construed so as to take away any authority of the regularly constituted peace officers in the state, but the Division of Arkansas State Police shall cooperate with them in the enforcement of the criminal laws of the state and assist such officers either in the enforcement of the law or apprehension of criminals.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as to authorize any officer of the Division of Arkansas State Police to serve writs unless they are specifically directed to the Division of Arkansas State Police, or an officer thereof, by the issuing authority.

No officer or member of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall ever be used in performing police duties on private property in connection with any strike, lockout, or other industrial disturbance.

(1)(A)The following law enforcement officers are prohibited from patrolling controlled-access facilities except as may be authorized by the director:

A municipal police officer;

An officer established under §14-42-401 et seq. [repealed];

A city marshal; and

A constable.

The director may withdraw any previously issued authorization to patrol controlled-access facilities.

(i)The director shall promulgate rules in accordance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., to establish criteria for granting or withdrawing authorization to patrol controlled-access facilities.

In adopting the rules described in subdivision (h)(1)(C)(i) of this section, the director at a minimum shall take into consideration the following factors:

Public safety;

Training of the law enforcement officers;

Size of the law enforcement agency;

Financial impact;

Abuse of police power; and

The types of roadways or highways that are controlled-access facilities for purposes of this section.

The following law enforcement officers may patrol any service roads that are within their jurisdiction situated adjacent to controlled-access facilities:

A municipal police officer; (B)An officer established under §14-42-401 et seq. [repealed];

A city marshal; and

A constable.

This subsection shall not prohibit a municipal police officer, an officer established under §14-42-401 et seq. [repealed], a city marshal, or a constable from responding to an accident or other emergency on a controlled-access facility.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, §§ 7, 8; 1963, No. 133, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-407, 42-408; Acts 1987, No. 509, § 1; 1997, No. 1240, § 7; 2001, No. 254, § 1; 2001, No. 441, § 1; 2001, No. 1697, § 4; 2007, No. 371, § 1; 2011, No. 741, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 846, 847; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5762-5765.

12-8-107. Arrests and detentions.

If any officer of the Division of Arkansas State Police delivers an arrested person to a county jail for detention, it shall be the duty of the jailer to receive the prisoner.

The division officer may notify the county sheriff or prosecuting officer of the county in which the crime was committed of the arrest and detention of the prisoner and make such lawful disposition of the prisoner as the division officer is directed to do by the county sheriff or prosecuting officer.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-408; Acts 2001, No. 1697, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 5766.

12-8-108. Security of Governor, capitol building, etc.

The Division of Arkansas State Police shall be responsible for the safety and security of the:

The division is authorized to assign officers of the division in such numbers and to such locations as is necessary to carry out the responsibility imposed on the division by this section.

Data, records, surveillance footage, security procedures, emergency plans, and other information compiled or possessed by the division concerning the Governor's Mansion and mansion grounds are confidential and not subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 422, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-914.1; Acts 2017, No. 483, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5767.

12-8-109. Police protection for statewide functions.

The Division of Arkansas State Police shall provide police protection, commensurate with the available personnel and resources of the division that are not required for other activities, benefiting any statewide function or similar activities sponsored or conducted by:

A state agency, board, or commission;

A state-supported college or university;

A private nonprofit association or organization on public property; or

Statewide athletic events under the auspices of the public schools.

For the purposes of this section, the statewide functions for which the division may provide police protection at the Arkansas State Fair and Livestock Showgrounds shall include the annual Arkansas State Fair and Livestock Show held at the showgrounds, and statewide athletic contests in which the public schools of this state participate which are held at the showgrounds.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 430, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-407.1; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5768.

12-8-110. Deputizing citizens in emergency.

Any Division of Arkansas State Police officer shall have the authority in case of emergency to call upon and deputize any reputable citizen of the state for assistance whenever it is deemed necessary for the proper enforcement of the law.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-413; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5769.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police”.

Cross References. Penalty for refusing to assist law enforcement officer, §5-54-109.

12-8-111. Cooperation among agencies.

It shall be the duty of the Division of Arkansas State Police and its officers to cooperate with other law enforcement agencies of this state in the investigation and apprehension of criminals and the prevention of crime within the state and to use every means at their disposal in disseminating information that will more effectively expedite the detection of crime and the apprehension and conviction of criminals and promote the highest possible degree of efficiency in the enforcement of the criminal and traffic laws of the state.

The law enforcement agencies of the state shall furnish to the division such information as they may have or shall hereafter acquire upon request of the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police relating to crime and criminals and otherwise cooperate with the division in the enforcement of the criminal and traffic laws of this state.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas Police” in (a) and (b); and substituted “division” for “department” twice in (b).

Cross References. Crime prevention generally, §12-11-101 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1961, No. 12, § 1, provided that the State Police Headquarters, in Warren, Bradley County, Arkansas, would be designated a permanent facility in the memory of the late Honorable Carroll C. Hollensworth and that the Arkansas State Police Commission should maintain it as a permanent district headquarters of the Arkansas State Police.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas Police” in (a) and in the second sentence of (b); substituted “Pulaski County” for “in the City of Little Rock” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in the first sentence (b).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas Police” in (a) and (b)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(2).

However, this chapter shall not be construed as relieving the prosecuting attorneys from any duties imposed upon them by law.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” twice in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” twice in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(1) and (a)(2); substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(2); and substituted “division” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(2) and (b).

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, §§ 10, 12; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-410, 42-412; Acts 2001, No. 1697, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 5770.

12-8-112. Headquarters — Identification Bureau.

The Division of Arkansas State Police shall maintain headquarters and an Identification Bureau which shall be located at the State Capitol or elsewhere in Pulaski County.

The division may establish district headquarters in other parts of the state if it is found to be necessary for the better enforcement of the provisions of this chapter. The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall have the authority to assign the personnel for the district headquarters when designated.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-411; Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 25; 2019, No. 910, § 5771.

12-8-113. Drug Abuse Enforcement Unit — Hot line.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police is directed to establish a Drug Abuse Enforcement Unit and assign sufficient supervisory, clerical, and enforcement personnel to carry out the duties and responsibilities of that unit as defined by the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, §5-64-101 et seq.

(1)The unit shall operate a “drug abuse hot line” to allow citizens to use a toll-free in-watts telephone line to report to the Division of Arkansas State Police information regarding possible violations of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, §5-64-101 et seq., and other provisions of Arkansas law relating to unlawful use of drugs.

The division shall encourage citizen involvement in combating drug-related crimes by publicizing the existence of the drug abuse hot line.

History.

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1017, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-404.1; Acts 1989, No. 859, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5772.

12-8-114. Legal counsel and advisors.

The Attorney General shall be the legal representative and advisor of the Arkansas State Police Commission, the Division of Arkansas State Police, and the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

However, the director, with the approval of the Attorney General and Governor, may employ other counsel when in the Attorney General's and Governor's judgment it is necessary for the proper enforcement of the provisions of this chapter and the efficient operation of the division.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-416; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5773.

12-8-115. Physicians and surgeons.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may designate one (1) physician and surgeon in each district of the state who shall be the physician and surgeon of the Division of Arkansas State Police within and for the district.

(1)The physician and surgeon shall conduct the physical examinations required by this chapter and give medical treatment to any member or officer of the division for injuries received while in the performance of official duty.

The physician and surgeon shall be given honorary commissions by the director and shall serve without pay.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 26; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-426; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5774.

12-8-116. Motor vehicles.

(1)All automobiles, motorcycles, or other vehicles of any nature owned, used, and operated by the Division of Arkansas State Police shall be exempt from the payment of any licenses, fees, and charges required by the laws of this state for the operation of the vehicles upon the public highways of this state.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall adopt identification tags or other insignia which shall be attached to the vehicles by the officers, members, and employees of the division, for which tag or insignia no charge shall be made or collected.

The division is granted authority to purchase used vehicles for use in confidential assignments and drug investigations.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 25; 1983, No. 537, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-409.1, 42-425; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5775.

12-8-117. Purchasing evidence.

Upon approval by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, a warrant may be drawn against the State Treasury for the amount up to but not to exceed the appropriated amount and deposited into a bank account for the purpose of purchasing evidence.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 540, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-420.1.

12-8-118. Payment of salaries and expenses.

The salaries and expenses provided for in this chapter shall be paid by warrant upon a voucher properly drawn by the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police and paid out of any funds now available for the payment of salaries and expenses of the Division of Arkansas State Police from the Division of Arkansas State Police Fund or any other fund as provided by law.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-414; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5776.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” twice and “Division of Arkansas State Police Fund” for “Department of Arkansas State Police Fund”.

Cross References. Department of Arkansas State Police Fund, §19-6-404.